verbs.lexd
PATTERN Prateritum
(( agrInitial VerbStem[Idecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[Idecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PratAdd[Idecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PratAdd[Idecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PratAdd[IIdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIIdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIIdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PratAdd[IIIdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IVdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IVdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PratAdd[reg]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[Vdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[Vdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PratAdd[reg]

PATTERN Imperfect
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IVdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IVdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] ImperfAdd[IVdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] ImperfAdd[IIdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[Idecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[Idecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] ImperfAdd[Idecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIIdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIIdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] ImperfAdd[reg]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[Vdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[Vdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] ImperfAdd[reg]

PATTERN Potentialis
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIIdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIIdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PotAdd[IIIdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIIdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIIdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PotAdd[reg]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[Vdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[Vdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PotAdd[Vdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[Idecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[Idecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PotAdd[reg]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PotAdd[reg]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IVdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IVdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PotAdd[reg]

PATTERN Prohibitive
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIIdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIIdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] ProhAdd[IIIdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[Idecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[Idecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] ProhAdd[Idecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] ProhAdd[IIdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IVdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IVdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] ProhAdd[IVdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[Vdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[Vdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] ProhAdd[Vdecl]

PATTERN EmphStem
Imperfect EmphAffix

PATTERN PratPart # p. 91
Prateritum PartAffix[irreg] agrMiddle

PATTERN NegPratPart # p. 91
Prateritum negSuffix[pst] PartAffix[irreg] agrMiddle

PATTERN ImpPart # p. 92
Imperfect PartAffix[reg] agrMiddle

PATTERN FutPart # p. 94
Potentialis FutAffix PartAffix[reg] agrMiddle

PATTERN FutNegPartI # pp. 95-96
Prohibitive negSuffix[pst] PartAffix[irreg] agrMiddle

PATTERN FutNegPartII # pp. 95-96
Prohibitive negSuffix[pst] CvbAffix[negFut] FutAffix PartAffix[reg] agrMiddle

PATTERN Masdar # pp. 90-91
Prateritum MasdarEnd[reg]

PATTERN NegMasdar # p. 91
Prateritum negSuffix[pst] MasdarEnd[neg]

PATTERN EmphNegMasdar # p. 95
EmphStem negSuffix[pst] MasdarEnd[neg]

PATTERN EmphNegPratPart # p. 95
EmphStem negSuffix[pst] PartAffix[irreg] agrMiddle

PATTERN EmphFutNegPartI # p. 95
EmphStem ProhAdd[IIIdecl] negSuffix[pst] PartAffix[irreg] agrMiddle

PATTERN EmphFutNegPartII # p. 95
EmphStem ProhAdd[IIIdecl] negSuffix[pst] CvbAffix[negFut] FutAffix PartAffix[reg] agrMiddle

PATTERN IrrPart # p. 99
VerbCopula agrMiddle
IrrPrtStem agrMiddle

PATTERN AllMasdars
Masdar
NegativeMasdar
EmphNegMasdar

PATTERN AllParticiples
PratPart
NegPratPart
ImpPart
FutNegPartI
FutNegPartII
EmphNegPratPart
EmphNegPratPart
EmphFutNegPartI
EmphFutNegPartII
CopulaPart

PATTERNS
VerbCopula
IrrPart
IrrCvb
#
## PRATERITUM DERIVATIVES
#
# ! prateritum, p. 91#Prateritum
# ! negative prateritum, p. 91#Prateritum negSuffix[pst]
# ! Prateritum converb, p. 91#Prateritum agrVerb CvbEnd[past]
# ! negative Prateritum converb, p. 91#Prateritum negSuffix[pst] CvbAffix[negCvb] agrVerb CvbEnd[past]
# ! Irrealis, p. 91
#Prateritum IrrAffix
# ! posterior converb, pp. 90-91
#Prateritum CvbEnd[post]
#Potentialis CvbEnd[post]
# ! limitative converb, pp. 90-91
#Prateritum CvbEnd[lim]
#Potentialis CvbEnd[lim]
# ! I imperative for intransitive, p. 97
#Prateritum ImperAffix[ImpI]
# ! II imperative for intransitive, p. 97
#Prateritum ImperAffix[ImpII]
# Positive Optative for intransitive, p. 97
#Prateritum ImperAffix[ImpII] OptEnd
#
## IMPERFECT DERIVATIVES
#
# ! imperfect infinitive, p. 92
#Imperfect InfAffix[reg]
# ! negative future, p. 92
#Imperfect negSuffix[fut]
# ! imperfect converb, p. 92
#Imperfect CvbEnd[praes]
#
## POTENTIALIS DERIVATIVES
#
# ! potentialis infinitive, p. 94#Potentialis InfAffix[reg]
# ! potentialis prospective converb, p. 94#Potentialis CvbAffix[prosp] agrVerb CvbEnd[past]
# ! potentialis future converb, p. 94#Potentialis FutAffix CvbEnd[praes]
# ! synth future, p. 93#Potentialis FutEnd[synth]
# ! reactive future, p. 93#Potentialis FutEnd[react]
# ! conditional converb, p. 93#Potentialis CvbEnd[cond]
# ! reason converb, p. 93
#Potentialis CvbEnd[rsn]
# ! conclusive converb, p. 93#Potentialis CvbEnd[conc]
# ! posterior converb, p. 93#Potentialis CvbEnd[post]
# ! I anterior converb, p. 93#Potentialis CvbEnd[antI]
# ! II anterior converb, p. 93#Potentialis CvbEnd[antII]
# ! imperative for transitive, pp. 96-97#Potentialis ImperAffix[ImpI]
# ! positive optative for transitive, p. 97#Potentialis ImperAffix[ImpI] OptEnd
#
## PROHIBITIVE DERIVATIVES
#
# ! regular prohibitive, pp. 94, 96#Prohibitive ProhEnd 
# ! negative infinitive p. 96#Prohibitive negSuffix[past] InfAffix[neg]
# ! negative future converb, p. 96#Prohibitive negSuffix[past] CvbAffix[negFut] FutAffix CvbEnd[praes]
# ! negative optative#Prohibitive ProhEnd OptEnd
#
## EMPHATIC NEGATIVE DERIVATIVES
#
# ! negative prateritum, 95#EmphStem negSuffix[pst]
# ! negative Prateritum converb, 95#EmphStem negSuffix[pst] CvbAffix[negCvb] agrVerb CvbEnd[past]
# ! negative future, p. 95#EmphStem negSuffix[fut]
# ! negative prohibitive, p. 95#EmphStem ProhAdd[IIIdecl] ProhEnd
# ! negative infinitive, p. 95#EmphStem ProhAdd[IIIdecl] negSuffix[past] InfAffix[neg]
# ! negative future converb, p. 95#EmphStem ProhAdd[IIIdecl] negSuffix[past] CvbAffix[negFut] FutAffix CvbEnd[praes]

# -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# VERB STEMS
# 
LEXICON VerbStem
багьи<verb>:агьи[Idecl,AgrInit] # 104 take away (irregular)
багьи<verb>:игьи[Idecl,AgrInit] # 104 take away (irregular)
басиᵸ<verb>:асвиᵸ[Idecl,AgrInit] # ask Gudava
белъу<verb>:елъви[Idecl,AgrInit] # 89
белъи<verb>:елъи[Idecl,AgrInit] # 876
бихи<verb>:ихи[Idecl,AgrInit] # 850 please
бихи<verb>:ихи[Idecl] # Gudava, please 
букӀуᵸ<verb>:укӀвиᵸ[Idecl,AgrInit] # 89
букъу<verb>:укъви[Idecl,AgrInit] # 863 cut
букъу<verb>:ухъви[Idecl,AgrInit] # Gudava cut
гьекьи<verb>:гьекьи[Idecl] #846
ичи<verb>:ичи[Idecl] # 849 give
квахи<verb>:квахи[Idecl]
кваххи<verb>:кваххи[Idecl] # 89
цӀахиᵸ<verb>:цӀахиᵸ[Idecl] 
цӀаххиᵸ<verb>:цӀаххиᵸ[Idecl] # 89
ангьаᵸ<verb>:ангьаᵸ[IIdecl] # 839 hear
агьаᵸ<verb>:агьаᵸ[IIdecl] # Gudava hear
алгьаᵸ<verb>:алхаᵸ[IIdecl] # M 37 hear
ба<verb>:а[IIdecl,AgrInit] # 101 go (irregular)
багӀари<verb>:багӀа[IIdecl] # bleat Gudava
бета<verb>:ета[IIdecl,AgrInit] # 89 leave
бикӀйаᵸ:икӀйаᵸ[IIdecl] # look (irregular)
битаᵸ<verb>:итаᵸ[IIdecl,AgrInit] # 89 miss
бичӀаᵸ:ичӀаᵸ[IIdecl] # 849 look (irregular)
бугъа<verb>:бугъа[IIdecl] # 89
букӀа<verb>:укӀа[IIdecl,AgrInit] # 101 be (irregular)
букӀа<verb>:укӀва[IIdecl,AgrInit] # 101 be (irregular)
букӀа<verb>:акӀа[IIdecl,AgrInit] # 101 be (irregular)
къочаᵸ<verb>:къочаᵸ[IIdecl] # 856 want
рекӀваᵸ<verb>:рекӀваᵸ[IIdecl]
эхва<verb>:эхва[IIdecl] #844
ба<verb>:е[IIIdecl,AgrInit] # 101 go (irregular)
бегъе<verb>:егъе[IIIdecl,AgrInit] #92
бихе<verb>:ихе[IIIdecl,AgrInit] # 850 
бугье<verb>:угье[IIIdecl,AgrInit] # throw (Gudava)
бугье<verb>:угьеᵸ[IIIdecl,AgrInit] # 863 explain
гьаᵸ<verb>:гьаᵸ[IIIdecl] # 104 see (irregular)
дже<verb>:дже[IIIdecl] # 843
рекӀвеᵸ<verb>:рекӀвеᵸ[IIIdecl] #92
хъаре<verb>:хъаре[IIIdecl] # 855
багӀари<verb>:багӀари[IVdecl] # 839 bleat
басаᵸ<verb>:асаᵸ[IVdecl,AgrInit] # 838 narrate
басиᵸ<verb>:асиᵸ[IVdecl,AgrInit]  # 838 ask
бешта<verb>:ешта[IVdecl,AgrInit] # 844 let go
бешта<verb>:ешда[IVdecl,AgrInit] # Gudava let go
белъи<verb>:елъи[IVdecl,AgrInit] # 101
гьигьвари<verb>:гьигьвари[IVdecl] # 847
къани<verb>:къани[IVdecl] # 856 eat
мади<verb>:мади[IVdecl]
мари<verb>:мари[IVdecl] #92
гьари<verb>:гьари[IVdecl] #846 ask
гьари<verb>:гьаари[IVdecl] # Gudava, ask
гьаᵸ<verb>:гьаᵸ[Vdecl] # 104 see (irregular)
тӀа<verb>:тӀа[Vdecl] #92

# -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# VERB DERIVATION
# 
LEXICON PratAdd
<aor>:[reg]
<aor>:{ᵸ}[IIdecl,IIIdecl]
<aor>:{v.и}{ᵸ}[Idecl] #83 for I declension and hpl forms of the II

LEXICON ImperfAdd
<imperf>:{р}а[reg]
<imperf>:{v.и}{ᵸ}{р}а[IIdecl,Idecl] #83
<imperf>:а{ᵸ}[IVdecl]

LEXICON PotAdd
<pot>:а{ᵸ}[reg]
<pot>:а{ᵸ}{л}а[IIIdecl]
<pot>:{р}а[Vdecl]

LEXICON ProhAdd
<proh>:{б}и[IIIdecl]
<proh>:{v.и}{ᵸ}{б}и[IIdecl,Idecl] #83
<proh>:аби[IVdecl]
<proh>:раби[Vdecl]

#derivational suffixes
LEXICON InfAffix
<inf>:[reg]
<inf>:а[neg]

LEXICON CvbEnd
<cvb>:о[past]
<cvb>:х[praes]
<cvb>:лис[post]
<cvb>:била[antI]
<cvb>:лъена[antII]
<cvb>:лъиба[lim]
<cvb>:къалъани[temp] # 597
<cvb>:къолъани[temp] # M 483
<cvb>:къалъир[temp] # M 483
<cvb>:ра[cond]
<cvb>:рала[conc]
<cvb>:ла[rsn]

LEXICON FutAffix
<fut>:лъи

LEXICON FutEnd
<fut><synth>:с[synth]
<fut><react>:са[react]

LEXICON ProhEnd
:се

LEXICON EmphAffix
:да

LEXICON IrrAffix
<irr>:гъалир

LEXICON CvbAffix
<prosp>:ди[prosp]
:ра[negCvb]
:а[negFut]

LEXICON PartAffix
<part>:{prt}[irreg]
<part>:о[reg]

#verb copulas
LEXICON VerbCopula
экӀва<verb><cop>:экӀва # 106
экӀва<verb><cop><neg>:вечӀе # 99
#ида<cop>:ида # М. 584

LEXICON MasdarEnd
<masd>:{р}[reg]
<masd>:р[neg]

LEXICON ImperAffix
<imp>:[ImpI]
<imp>:{б}е[ImpII]

LEXICON OptEnd
<opt>:ла

LEXICON IrrPrtStem
белъи<verb><part>:белъилъо
ба<verb><part>:балъо

LEXICON IrrCvb
белъи<verb><cvb>:белъилъах
ба<verb><cvb>:балъах

# -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# VERB INFLECTION
# 
#agrInitial as ersatz
LEXICON agrInitial
<M><sg>:в[Msg]
<F><sg>:й[Fsg]
<N><sg>:б[Nsg]
<H><pl>:б[Hpl]
<N><pl>:р[Npl]

LEXICON agrMiddle
<M><sg>:в[Msg]
<F><sg>:й[Fsg]
<N><sg>:{б}[Nsg]
<H><pl>:{б}{agrA}[Hpl]
<N><pl>:{р}[Npl]

LEXICON agrVerb
<M><sg>:в[Msg]
<F><sg>:й[Fsg]
<N><sg>:{б}[Nsg]
<H><pl>:{р}[Hpl]
<H><pl>:{б}{agrA}[Hpl]
<N><pl>:{р}[Npl]

LEXICON negSuffix
<neg>:чӀи[pst]
<fut><neg>:чӀе[fut]

LEXICON TimeMarker
<temp>:къалъани[temp] # 597
<temp>:къолъани[temp] # M 483
<temp>:къалъир[temp] # M 483
